Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 3. Amendment.

Sec. 10.20.171.
Right to amend articles of incorporation.

A corporation may amend its articles of incorporation, from time to time, in any and as many respects as may be desired, so long as its articles of incorporation, as amended, contain only those provisions which might lawfully be contained in original articles of incorporation at the time the amendment is made.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.176.
Procedure to amend articles of incorporation.

Amendments to the articles of incorporation shall be made in the manner set out in this section.

If there are members entitled to vote, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution setting out the proposed amendment and directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written notice setting out the proposed amendment or a summary of the changes shall be given to each member entitled to vote within the time and in the manner provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of members. The proposed amendment shall be adopted upon receiving at least two-thirds of the votes which members present at the meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast.

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote, an amendment shall be adopted at a meeting of the board of directors upon receiving the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

Any number of amendments may be submitted and voted upon at any one meeting.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, this section was reorganized to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes. The former introductory clause was designated as subsection (a) and minor word changes were made to reflect the reorganization. Former paragraphs (1) — (3) were redesignated as subsections (b) — (d) respectively.

Sec. 10.20.181.
Articles of amendment.

The articles of amendment shall be executed in duplicate by the corporation by its president or a vice president, and its secretary or an assistant secretary, and must set out

the name of the corporation;

the amendment adopted;

if there are members entitled to vote on the amendment,

a statement setting out the date of the meeting of members at which the amendment was adopted, that a quorum was present at the meeting, and that the amendment received at least two-thirds of the votes which members present at the meeting or represented by proxy were entitled to cast; or

a statement that the amendment was adopted by a consent in writing signed by all members entitled to vote with respect to the amendment;

if there are no members, or no members entitled to vote, a statement of that fact, the date of the meeting of the board of directors at which the amendment was adopted, and a statement of the fact that the amendment received the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.186.
Filing of articles of amendment.

Duplicate originals of the articles of amendment shall be delivered to the commissioner. Upon finding that the articles of amendment conform to law, the commissioner shall, when all fees prescribed in this chapter have been paid,

endorse on each duplicate original the word “filed,” and the date of the filing;

file one duplicate original in the commissioner’s office;

issue a certificate of amendment and affix the other duplicate original to it.

The certificate of amendment, together with the duplicate original of the articles of amendment affixed by the commissioner, shall be returned to the corporation or its representative.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.191.
Effect of certificate of amendment.

Upon the issuance of the certificate of amendment by the commissioner, the amendment becomes effective and the articles of incorporation are considered amended accordingly.

An amendment does not affect an existing cause of action in favor of or against the corporation, or a pending suit to which the corporation is a party, or the existing rights of persons other than members. In the event the corporate name is changed by amendment, a suit brought by or against the corporation under its former name does not abate for that reason.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989 the term “members” was substituted for “shareholders” in (b) of this section to correct a manifest error in ch. 99, SLA 1968.

Sec. 10.20.196.
Restated articles of incorporation.

A domestic corporation may at any time restate its articles of incorporation as theretofore amended in the manner set out in this section.

If there are members entitled to vote, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution setting out the proposed restated articles of incorporation and directing that they be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote, which may be either an annual or a special meeting.

Written notice setting out the proposed restated articles or a summary of the provisions shall be given to each member entitled to vote within the time and in the manner provided in this chapter for giving notice of meetings to members. If the meeting is an annual meeting, the proposed restated articles or a summary of the provisions may be included in the notice of the annual meeting.

At the meeting a vote of the members entitled to vote shall be taken on the proposed restated articles. The restated articles shall be adopted upon receiving the affirmative vote of a majority of the members entitled to vote who are present at the meeting or represented by proxy.

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote, the proposed restated articles shall be adopted at a meeting of the board of directors upon receiving the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors in office.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, this section was reorganized to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes. The former introductory clause was designated as subsection (a) and minor word changes were made to reflect the reorganization. Former paragraphs (1) — (4) were redesignated as subsections (b) — (e) respectively.

Sec. 10.20.201.
Execution of restated articles of incorporation.

Upon approval, the restated articles of incorporation shall be executed in duplicate by the corporation by its president or a vice-president and by its secretary or assistant secretary.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 31 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.20.206.
Contents of restated articles of incorporation.

The restated articles of incorporation must set out

the name of the corporation;

the period of its duration;

the purpose or purposes which the corporation is authorized to pursue;

other provisions, not inconsistent with law, which are set out in the articles of incorporation as amended, except that it is not necessary to set out in the restated articles of incorporation the registered office of the corporation, its registered agent, its directors or its incorporators;

a statement that the restated articles of incorporation correctly set out the provisions of the articles of incorporation as amended, and that they have been adopted as required by law and that they supersede the original articles of incorporation and all amendments.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.211.
Filing of restated articles of incorporation with commissioner.

Duplicate originals of the restated articles of incorporation shall be delivered to the commissioner. Upon finding that the restated articles of incorporation conform to law, the commissioner shall, when all fees prescribed in this chapter have been paid,

endorse on each duplicate original the word “filed,” and the date of the filing;

file one duplicate original in the commissioner’s office;

issue a restated certificate of incorporation and affix the other duplicate original to it.

The restated certificate of incorporation, together with the duplicate original of the restated articles of incorporation affixed by the commissioner, shall be returned to the corporation or its representative.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)